Louisiana, session 2026, SB495.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1463(C), the introductory paragraph of 1483(7)(a), 1483(7)(b)(i),
Page 1 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
(10), (11)(b)(ii), (11)(d)(i), the introductory paragraph of R.S. 18:1483(21)(b) and (d),
1491.5(B)(2)(a), 1491.6(D)(1), (D)(3)(a) and (b), the introductory paragraph of R.S.
18:1491.6(E), (E)(1), (J), 1491.7(B)(4)(a) and (b), (5), and (8), 1491.9(C)(2),
1495.3(B)(2)(a), 1495.4(D)(1), (D)(3)(a) and (b), the introductory paragraph of R.S.
18:1495.4(E), (E)(1), 1495.5(B)(5) and (7), the introductory paragraph of R.S. 18:1501.3(C),
1505.2(B)(2), (H)(1)(c), (2)(e), and (3)(a)(iii), (b), and (c), 1505.2(I)(1)(b)(i)(cc) and (iii),
and (c)(iii), (I)(2)(a)(i)(dd), (I)(2)(a)(ii)(cc), (I)(2)(a)(v), (I)(7), 1505.2.1(A)(1) and (G)(2),
1505.4(A)(2)(a)(i), and 1505.5(B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
18:1463(H) and 1483(7)(a)(vi) and (11)(d)(vi) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1463. Political material; ethics; prohibitions
* * *
C.(1) No person shall cause to be distributed, or transmitted, any oral, visual,
digital, or written material containing any statement which he knows or should be
reasonably expected to know makes a false statement about a candidate for election
in a primary or general election or about a proposition to be submitted to the voters.
(2) Whenever any person, political committee, entity or organization as
defined in R.S. 18:1483, makes a disbursement for the purpose of the financing of
any electioneering communication, such communication shall comply with the
following items under the following circumstances:
(a) If the communication is paid for and authorized by a candidate, an
authorized political committee of a candidate, or its agents, it shall clearly state that
the communication has been paid for by such authorized political committee. The
name of the political committee paying for the communication shall be given in full
and no acronyms shall be used.
(b) If the communication is paid for by other persons, but authorized by a
candidate, an authorized political committee of a candidate, or its agents, it shall
clearly state that the communication is paid for by such other persons and authorized
by such authorized political committee. The name of the authorized political
committee shall be given in full and no acronyms shall be used.
(c) If the communication is not authorized by a candidate, a political
Page 2 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
principal campaign committee of a candidate, or its agents, it shall clearly state the
(i) name, (ii) physical address (not post office box), and (iii) telephone number and,
or the world-wide web address if available of the person, committee, entity or
organization who paid for the communication and ; and (iii) state that the
communication is not authorized by any candidate or candidate committee. The
name of the payer shall be given in full and no acronyms shall be used.
(d) In visual and oral political announcements or advertisements, the
statement required by this Subsection shall be included so that it is clearly
understandable as well as audible or visible for not less than four seconds.
(e) In digital announcements or advertisements, the name of the
third-party entity shall appear in text sized at least as large as the smallest text
in the digital material or in a heading or similar section of text displayed above
or within the digital material that is visually distinct from the remainder of the
digital material's text and shall have a reasonable degree of color contrast
between the background and the name of the third-party entity.
(3) If an individual, association, organization, committee, or corporation is
responsible for or causes the distribution or transmission of any statements relative
to candidates or propositions which do not fully disclose the name of the individual
or the name of the association, organization, committee, or corporation, and the full
and correct name and address of its chairman or other chief administrative officer
and whether or not such individual, association, organization, committee, or
corporation supports or opposes such candidate or proposition, such individual,
association, organization, committee, or corporation shall report all expenditures
incurred in relation to the publication, distribution, transportation, or transmission
in accordance with R.S. 18:1491.7, 1495.5, or 1501.1.
(4)(3)(a) No person shall misrepresent himself or any committee or
organization under his control as speaking, writing, or otherwise acting for or on
behalf of any candidate, political committee, or political party, or any employee or
agent thereof.
(b) No person shall willfully and knowingly participate in or conspire to
Page 3 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
participate in a plan, scheme, or design to misrepresent himself or any committee or
organization under his control or under the control of any other participant in the
plan, scheme, or design as speaking, writing, or otherwise acting for or on behalf of
any candidate, political committee, or political party, or any employee or agent
thereof.
(c) A radio or television broadcaster who broadcasts a paid political
announcement or advertisement, the content of which the broadcaster had no input
in or control over, is not subject to the provisions of this Paragraph.
(5)(4) For purposes of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the term
"electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or satellite
communication that refers to a legally qualified candidate for elected office and is
broadcast within sixty days before any election in which such candidate is on the
ballot.
* * *
H. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a media entity that
broadcasts a paid political announcement or advertisement, in which the
broadcaster has had no input in or control over the announcement or
advertisement. As used in this Subsection, the term "media entity" includes a
radio broadcast station, television broadcast station, cable or satellite television
company, or other video service provider, streaming video provider, newspaper
company, periodical company, billboard company, advertisement agency, or
media platform responsible for the production or publication of any
advertisement, voice, data, or other communications, information services, or
internet access provider, or bona fide news or public interest website operator.
* * *
§1483. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings given
to each in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(7)(a) "Contribution", except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, means
Page 4 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
a gift, conveyance, payment, or deposit of money or anything of value, or the
forgiveness of a loan or of a debt made directly or through a joint fundraising
agreement to any of the following:
* * *
(vi) A recognized political party that receives contributions in an
aggregate amount of one thousand dollars within any calendar year.
(b) "Contribution" shall also include, without limitation:
(i) Contributions in-kind made for any of the purposes stated in this
Paragraph, having an attributable monetary value in excess of fifty two hundred
dollars. Contributions in-kind shall include without limitation: the donation by any
person, other than a candidate or a political committee, of the services of paid
employees, the value of which services exceeds fifty two hundred dollars, such
value to be the amount paid for such services; the donation of, or the donation of the
right to use, any item of tangible property when the same is used or consumed and
not exchanged or converted to cash or the equivalent of cash and when the accepting
candidate, the chairman of the accepting political committee, or accepting person
required to file reports under this Chapter and the treasurer of such recipient, if any,
determines that its value or the use value, when only the right of use is given,
exceeds fifty two hundred dollars and such determination shall be prima facie
evidence of the correctness of the valuation of the item or of the use value when
applicable. In addition, successive donations made by the same person, which
donations individually are valued below fifty two hundred dollars but which
together exceed such amount, shall be deemed to be in-kind contributions and shall
be aggregated for purposes of the requirements of this Chapter.
* * *
(10) "Election" means any party primary, second party primary, primary,
general, special, or other election held, pursuant to the laws of this state or a parish
or municipal charter or ordinance or a court order, to choose a public officer or
nominee. For purposes of the reporting requirements for the support or opposition
of a proposition or question submitted to the voters, "election" shall also mean any
Page 5 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
primary, general, or special election, except local option elections held pursuant to
the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 26 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, at
which a proposition or question is submitted to the voters in accordance with
Chapters 6-A, 6-B, and 6-C of this Code.
(11)(a) * * *
(b) "Expenditure" shall also include:
* * *
(ii) Expenditures in-kind which have an attributable monetary value in excess
of fifty two hundred dollars, made for any of the purposes stated in this Paragraph
to a committee. Expenditures in-kind shall include without limitation: the donation
by any person, candidate, or committee of the services of paid employees, the value
of which services exceeds fifty two hundred dollars, such value to be the amount
paid for such services; the donation of, or the donation of the right to use, any item
of tangible property when the same is used or consumed and not exchanged or
converted to cash or the equivalent of cash and when the donating candidate, the
chairman of the donating committee, or the donating person required to file reports
under this Chapter, and the campaign treasurer of such donor, if any, determines that
its value or the use value, when only the right to use is given, exceeds fifty two
hundred dollars and such determination shall be prima facie evidence of the
correctness of the valuation of the item or the use value when applicable. In addition,
successive donations made to the same person, candidate or committee in which
donations individually are valued below fifty two hundred dollars but which
together exceed such amount, shall be deemed to be in-kind expenditures and shall
be aggregated for purposes of the requirements of this Chapter.
* * *
(d) "Expenditure" shall not include:
(i) Personal services provided voluntarily by any person without
compensation or by any person who is employed by a candidate for purposes other
than solely campaign purposes by the reporting candidate, by a partnership of which
he the candidate is a member, or by a corporation of which he the candidate owns
Page 6 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
a majority of the stock.
* * *
(vi) Any communication over the internet, except for express advocacy
communications placed or promoted for a fee on another person's website,
digital device, application, or advertising platform. A communication is
promoted for a fee if a payment is made to a website, digital device, application,
or advertising platform in order to increase the circulation, prominence, or
availability of the communication on that website, digital device, application, or
advertising platform.
* * *
(21) "Participation" or "participating" in an election means the following:
* * *
(b) With regard to a political committee, that the committee:
* * *
(d) With regard to a person who solicits or receives any contribution or
makes any expenditure in support of or in opposition to a proposition or question
submitted to the voters, that said person solicited or received a contribution or made
an expenditure of two hundred fifty dollars or more.
* * *
§1491.5. Maintenance of records; valuation of in-kind contributions and
expenditures
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) Payments made to purchase raffle tickets or paraphernalia, other than
expenditures made by a committee for its own paraphernalia, and payments for
tickets to testimonials and similar fundraising events are contributions, and records
thereof shall be maintained, provided that:
(a) In the case of any single transaction involving the sale of raffle tickets or
paraphernalia which is for an amount not in excess of fifty two hundred dollars and
the proceeds of which are received and deposited by a political committee, no record
Page 7 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
need be kept by the treasurer for such recipient committee, except the total amount
received and deposited from such sale and the fact that such amount was received
from such sale.
* * *
§1491.6. Reports required; reporting times and periods
* * *
D.(1) If the final report of a committee for an election, as required by
Paragraph (B)(5), (6), or (7) of this Section, or the most recent monthly report of
such committee pursuant to Subsection I of this Section shows a deficit or a surplus,
the chairman and treasurer of the committee, if any, shall file supplemental reports
with the supervisory committee of all information required in R.S. 18:1491.7. Such
reports shall be filed annually no later than February twenty-eighth March fifteenth
and shall be complete through the preceding December thirty-first. Such a
supplemental report shall be filed each year until a report has been filed which shows
no deficit and until any surplus campaign funds have been disposed of in accordance
with R.S. 18:1505.2(I). The report on surplus funds shall disclose the disbursement
of such funds in the same manner as expenditures are reported.
* * *
(3)(a) A report need not be filed under this Subsection if the committee is
dissolved and shows a deficit of less than five thousand dollars. However, if the
committee is dissolved and its deficit is equal to or greater than five thousand dollars,
the committee shall file supplemental reports with the supervisory committee of all
information required in R.S. 18:1491.7. Such report shall be filed annually no later
than February twenty-eighth March fifteenth and shall be complete through the
preceding December thirty-first. Such report shall be filed each year for five years
or until a report has been filed which shows no deficit or surplus.
(b) However, if after five years a committee with a deficit receives any
contribution or if any repayment occurs on an outstanding debt or loan, such
committee shall file a supplemental report by the following February twenty-eighth
March fifteenth which shall be complete through the preceding December
Page 8 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
thirty-first.
* * *
E. A report shall be filed for each committee of all information required in
R.S. 18:1491.7 no later than February twenty-eighth March fifteenth of each year
which shall be complete as of the preceding December thirty-first. The annual report
required by this Subsection shall not be required:
(1) If under another provision of this Section, the committee has filed another
report of the information required by R.S. 18:1491.7 at any time after the preceding
December tenth and prior to the February fifteenth March fifteenth due date, or
* * *
J. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to reports filed by a
leadership committee or by the elected governor pursuant to R.S. 18:1501.3.
* * *
§1491.7. Reports; contents
* * *
B. Each report required to be in conformity with this Section shall contain the
following information:
* * *
(4) Contributions received during the reporting period for which the report
is being completed shall be reported, and the same shall be reported irrespective of
the amount thereof except as otherwise provided, as follows:
(a) The full name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions, except contributions in the form of a payroll deduction or dues check-
off system, to and which have been received and accepted by the committee during
the reporting period, and whose contribution or contributions have an aggregate
amount or value in excess of two hundred dollars within the calendar year; the
aggregate amount of such contributions, except in-kind contributions, from each
person, and the date and amount of each such contribution; and a brief description
of each in-kind contribution from each person, the valuation thereof made by the
chairman and the treasurer, and the date of the in-kind contribution.
Page 9 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
(b) The full name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions in the form of a payroll deduction or dues check-off system in excess
of twenty-five dollars in the aggregate in a calendar year to and which have been
received and accepted by the committee during the reporting period, and the date and
amount of each contribution. In the case of a political committee that supports
multiple candidates or issues and receives over ten thousand contributions in the
form of a payroll deduction or dues check-off system when no single contributor
contributes in excess of fifty two hundred dollars in the aggregate in a calendar
year, such committee may elect to report the names and addresses of its contributors
on an annual basis. Political committees making this election shall list the names and
addresses of its contributors, the total amount of the contributions received per
contributor, and the schedule of the receipt of such contributions on the annual report
due by February twenty-eighth March fifteenth complete through the preceding
December thirty-first.
* * *
(5)(a) The gross proceeds received and accepted by the committee during the
reporting period from the sale of paraphernalia. Purchases of paraphernalia from the
committee which are made by the same person and are of such amount as to be
reportable, either singly or in the aggregate, as provided in Paragraph (4) of this
Subsection, shall be so reported; however, single transactions to purchase
paraphernalia which are not in excess of fifty two hundred dollars must be reported
only in the report of gross proceeds and shall not be required to be reported as
provided in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
(b) The gross proceeds received and accepted by the committee during the
reporting period from the sale of raffle tickets. Purchases of raffle tickets that are
made by the same person and are of such amount as to be reportable, either singly
or in the aggregate, as required in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection, shall be so
reported; however, single transactions to purchase raffle tickets which are not in
excess of fifty two hundred dollars must be reported only in the report of gross
proceeds and shall not be required to be reported as provided in Paragraph (4) of this
Page 10 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
Subsection.
* * *
(8) Any other cash receipts, not contributions, received from any other source
not included above during the reporting period, for example, refunds of
overpayments or excess contributions, refunds for services or goods, interest on
cash balances, cash investment income, and the nature, source, and an explanation
thereof.
* * *
§1491.9. Joint fundraising; joint fundraising representative or committee; authority,
requirements, and prohibitions
* * *
C. The participants shall designate a joint fundraising representative pursuant
to one of the following:
* * *
(2) The participants may designate a political committee to serve as the joint
fundraising representative, referred to in this Section as a "joint fundraising
committee". A joint fundraising committee shall report all contributions made to the
joint fundraising effort as contributions to the joint fundraising committee and shall
report the distribution of proceeds pursuant to this Section as expenditures made to
the participants pursuant to R.S. 18:1491.6, 1491.6.1, and 1491.7. Each participant
shall report the amounts received from the joint fundraising committee as
contributions from each contributor. The joint fundraising committee chairman shall
be responsible for all duties of the joint fundraising representative provided for in
this Section. Within ten days following the execution of the joint fundraising
agreement, the joint fundraising committee shall file a statement of organization with
the supervisory committee as provided in R.S. 18:1491.1.
* * *
§1495.3. Maintenance of records; valuation of in-kind contributions and
expenditures
* * *
Page 11 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
B.(1) * * *
(2) Payments made to purchase raffle tickets or campaign paraphernalia,
other than expenditures made by a candidate for his own paraphernalia, and
payments for tickets to testimonials and similar fundraising events are contributions,
and records thereof shall be maintained, provided that:
(a) In the case of any single transaction involving the sale of raffle tickets or
paraphernalia which is for an amount not in excess of fifty two hundred dollars and
the proceeds of which are received and deposited by a candidate, no record need be
kept by the campaign treasurer for such recipient candidate, except the total amount
received and deposited from such sale and the fact that such amount was received
from such sale.
* * *
§1495.4. Reports required; reporting times and periods; extension
* * *
D.(1) If the final report of a candidate for an election, as required by
Paragraph(B)(5), (6), or (7) of Subsection B of this Section, shows a deficit or a
surplus, the candidate and his treasurer, if any, shall file supplemental reports with
the supervisory committee of all information required in R.S. 18:1495.5. Such
reports shall be filed annually no later than February twenty-eighth March fifteenth
and shall be complete through the preceding December thirty-first. Such a
supplemental report shall be filed each year until a report has been filed which shows
no deficit and until any surplus campaign funds have been disposed of in accordance
with R.S. 18:1505.2(I). The report on surplus funds shall disclose the disbursement
of such funds in the same manner as expenditures are reported.
* * *
(3)(a) A report need not be filed under this Subsection if the candidate is not
an elected public official and shows either a deficit or a surplus of less than five
thousand dollars. However, if the candidate is not an elected public official and his
deficit or surplus is equal to or greater than five thousand dollars, the candidate shall
file supplemental reports with the supervisory committee of all information required
Page 12 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
in R.S. 18:1495.5. Such report shall be filed annually no later than February twenty-
eighth March fifteenth and shall be complete through the preceding December
thirty-first. Such report shall be filed each year for five years or until a report has
been filed which shows no deficit or surplus.
(b) However, if after five years a candidate with a deficit receives any
contribution or if any repayment occurs on an outstanding debt or loan, such
candidate shall file a supplemental report by the following February fifteenth March
fifteenth which shall be complete through the preceding December thirty-first.
* * *
E. A report shall be filed for each candidate, as defined by R.S. 18:1483(3),
of all information required in R.S. 18:1495.5 no later than February fifteenth March
fifteenth of each year which shall be complete as of the preceding December thirty-
first. The annual report required by this Subsection shall not be required:
(1) If under another provision of this Section the candidate has filed another
report of the information required by R.S. 18:1495.5 at any time after the preceding
December tenth and prior to February fifteenth March fifteenth due date, or
* * *
§1495.5. Reports; contents
* * *
B. Each report required to be in conformity with this Section shall contain the
following information:
* * *
(5)(a) The gross proceeds received and accepted by the candidate during the
reporting period from the sale of paraphernalia. Purchases of such campaign
paraphernalia which are made by the same person and which are of such amount as
to be reportable, either singly or in the aggregate, as required in Paragraph (4) of this
Subsection, shall be so reported; however, single transactions to purchase campaign
items or materials which are not in excess of fifty two hundred dollars must be
reported only in the report of gross proceeds and shall not be required to be reported
as provided in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
Page 13 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
(b) The gross proceeds received and accepted by the candidate during the
reporting period from the sale of raffle tickets. Purchases of raffle tickets that are
made by the same person and are of such amount as to be reportable, either singly
or in the aggregate, as provided in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection, shall be so
reported; however, single transactions to purchase raffle tickets which are not in
excess of fifty two hundred dollars must be reported only in the report of gross
proceeds and shall not be required to be reported as provided in Paragraph (4) of this
Subsection.
* * *
(7) Any other cash receipts, not contributions, from any other source not
included above during the reporting period, for example, refunds of overpayments
or excess contributions, refunds for services or goods, interest on cash balances,
cash investment income, and the nature, source, and an explanation thereof.
* * *
§1501.3. Gubernatorial transition and inauguration; contribution limits; reports
* * *
C. On or before the sixtieth day after the gubernatorial inauguration and by
February twenty-eighth March fifteenth annually thereafter until all contributions
have been expended or used, the governor shall file an all-inclusive report with the
supervisory committee. Each report shall be complete through January thirty-first.
Each report shall state:
* * *
§1505.2. Contributions; expenditures; certain prohibitions and limitations
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) Any single transaction involving the sale of paraphernalia, in which the
transaction is for not in excess of fifty two hundred dollars and in which transaction
the purchaser is not known, shall not be deemed to constitute an anonymous
contribution under the provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
Page 14 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
H.(1)(a) * * *
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, the
contribution limit for contributions made to an unsuccessful major office candidate,
or the principal campaign committee and any subsidiary committee of such
unsuccessful candidate, who does not participate in the general election, or a party
primary candidate who does not participate in either the second party primary,
primary, or general election and for the time period for which such candidate has a
deficit for expenditures made through the day of the primary election or closed party
primary, shall be twenty-four thousand dollars.
(2)(a) * * *
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, the contributions contribution limit for
contributions by leadership committees or political committees to an unsuccessful
major office candidate, or the principal campaign committee and subsidiary
committee of such unsuccessful candidate, who does not participate in the general
election,; or a party primary candidate who does not participate in either the second
party primary, primary, or general election; and for the time period for which such
candidate has a deficit for expenditures made through the day of the primary election
or closed party primary, shall be twenty-four thousand dollars.
* * *
(3)(a)(i) * * *
* * *
(iii) For purposes of this Subsection, for candidates for a primary party
primary office, principal campaign committees, political committees, and
independent expenditure-only committees that participate in a second party primary,
the reporting period for the second party primary election shall be deemed to begin
the day following the primary election.
* * *
(b) No person shall make a loan, transfer of funds, or contribution, including
Page 15 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
but not limited to funds for any purchase of campaign materials for more than fifty
two hundred dollars, funds for the purchase of testimonial tickets, and any in-kind
contribution, in the aggregate for all reporting periods for an election, as defined in
this Paragraph, including reporting periods for any supplemental reports required,
in excess of the contribution limits established in Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this
Subsection, except as otherwise specifically provided in this Subsection.
(c) No candidate including his principal campaign committee or subsidiary
committee thereof or leadership committee, shall accept from the same contributor
a loan, transfer of funds, or contribution, including but not limited to funds for any
purchase of campaign materials for more than fifty two hundred dollars, funds for
the purchase of testimonial tickets, and any in-kind contribution, in the aggregate for
all reporting periods of an election, as defined in this Paragraph, including reporting
periods for any supplemental reports, in excess of the contribution limits established
in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, except as otherwise specifically provided in this
Subsection, and except that the provisions of Paragraph (2) shall apply for
contributions accepted from a leadership committee, political committee, or principal
campaign committee. The provisions of this Subparagraph shall not apply to
recognized political parties and their state central committees.
* * *
I.(1)(a) Contributions received by a candidate or committee may be expended
for any lawful purpose related to any of the following:
* * *
(b)(i) In addition to the permitted expenditures provided in Subparagraph (a)
of this Paragraph, contributions received by a candidate or a candidate's principal
campaign committee, or any subsidiary committee thereof, may also be expended for
any lawful purpose related to any of the following:
* * *
(cc) Contributions to another candidate's principal campaign committee, to
a political committee, or to a leadership committee, to an independent-
expenditure-only committee, or to a recognized political party of a parish
Page 16 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
executive committee.
* * *
(iii) Excess Surplus campaign contributions funds received by a candidate
or a candidate's principal campaign committee and not expended during a party
primary, second party primary, primary, or general election may be maintained in
a segregated fund or a fund of the candidate's principal campaign committee for use
in future political campaigns, activity related to preparing for future candidacy to
elective office, or for any lawful purpose provided for in this Subparagraph and
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. Any excess surplus campaign contributions
received from a contributor deposited in or transferred to a segregated fund shall
not be considered as a contribution from the contributor for the calculation of the
amount contributed by the contributor to the candidate for the candidate's next
election campaign, such that the limits on contributions calculated for each
contributor under this Section shall remain separately applicable for each
separate election.
(c)(i) * * *
(iii) For purposes of this Subparagraph, use of funds by a leadership
committee to replace, repair, or clean articles lost, stolen, soiled, or damaged in
connection with the operations of the leadership committee or the holding of public
office or party position by the public officer shall not be considered personal use.
* * *
(2)(a) The following expenditures shall not be considered to be personal use
by the candidate or his principal campaign committee or a subsidiary committee
thereof, or by an elected official or his leadership committee:
(i) Expenses related to the attendance at political or professional events by
the candidate and any accompanying spouse and children, including:
* * *
(dd) Conventions and conferences of issue or social advocacy groups or
related educational programs.
(ii) Reasonable costs of security measures for a candidate, elected official,
Page 17 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
member of their family, or campaign employees, including, but not limited to:
* * *
(cc) Security personnel and, services, and related transportation that are
bona fide, legitimate, and professional.
* * *
(v) Reasonable costs to replace or repair articles lost, stolen, or damaged in
connection with the campaign or to clean articles when required due to their use
in connection with the campaign or holding public office.
* * *
(7) Contributions made in excess of the limits provided in this Section to a
candidate, principal campaign committee, political committee, or leadership
committee shall be returned by the candidate or committee to the contributor by
check drawn on the campaign account. If the check is not negotiated within twelve
months of the date of the check, the excess amount shall be presumed abandoned and
shall be paid, transferred, or caused to be paid or transferred in accordance with the
Uniform Unclaimed Property Act of 1997 by the candidate or committee not later
than February twenty-eighth March fifteenth of the calendar year after the calendar
year in which the excess amount was presumed abandoned.
* * *
§1505.2.1. Designation and attribution of contributions
A.(1) A candidate may receive contributions designated in writing for use in
connection with any election in a single election cycle, whether a party primary
election, a second party primary election, primary election, or general election.
The candidate shall use an acceptable accounting method to distinguish between
contributions attributed to each particular election.
* * *
G.(1) * * *
(2) A candidate may request that redesignate all or part of a contribution
designated for a certain election be redesignated for a different election if the
contribution, either on its face or when aggregated with other contributions from the
Page 18 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 495 ENROLLED
same contributor for the same election, exceeds the contributions limitation provided
in R.S. 18:1505.2(H).
* * *
§1505.4. Civil penalties; failure to file; timely and accurate filing; forfeiture
A. * * *
(2)(a) The amount of such penalty may be:
(i) One hundred dollars per day, not to exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars, for each candidate for major office and, any treasurer or chairman of any
committee designated as a principal campaign committee or subsidiary committee
of such a candidate, and the elected governor for a gubernatorial transition or
inauguration.
* * *
§1505.5. Civil penalties; violation of Chapter
* * *
B. The amount of such penalty shall be:
(1) Not in excess of five hundred dollars for each candidate for a major office
and, any treasurer or chairman of any committee designated as a principal campaign
committee or subsidiary committee of such a candidate, and the elected governor
for a gubernatorial transition or inauguration.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 18:1491.7(B)(22) is hereby repealed.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 19 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.